Florida, session 2026, HB915.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 409.9041, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
409.9041 Working People with Disabilities program.—
(1) As used in this section, the term "department" means
the Department of Children and Families.
(2) The Working People with Disabilities program is
established within the agency. The purpose of the program is to
eliminate barriers to employment by allowing certain working
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb915 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 915 2026 Legislature
individuals with disabilities to maintain eligibility for
Medicaid home and community-based services waiver programs while
working and earning additional income.
(3) A person is eligible for the program and must be
automatically enrolled if he or she:
(a) Has a developmental disability as defined in s.
393.063.
(b) Is currently enrolled in a Medicaid home and
community-based services waiver, including the home and
community-based services Medicaid waiver program under s.
393.0662, the familial dysautonomia waiver authorized under s.
409.912(10), the long-term care managed care program under s.
409.978, the pilot program for individuals with developmental
disabilities under s. 409.9855, or the Florida Medicaid Model
Waiver.
(c) Is at least 18 years of age.
(d) Is employed and has earned income.
(4) To maintain Medicaid eligibility, an enrollee in this
program may not exceed a maximum monthly income of 550 percent
of the Supplemental Security Income Federal Benefit Rate
established by the Social Security Administration. The agency
and the department must disregard assets up to $13,000 for an
individual and up to $24,000 for a couple and exclude assets
held in a retirement account recognized by the Internal Revenue
Service from asset limits when determining eligibility for the
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb915 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 915 2026 Legislature
Medicaid program.
(5) The department shall provide written notice to
eligible adults upon initial enrollment in a waiver described in
paragraph (3)(b), and at least annually thereafter. The notice
shall clearly and concisely communicate all of the following
information:
(a) Automatic enrollment in the program.
(b) Eligibility and qualifications for the program.
(c) The ability to maintain Medicaid benefits while
earning income in the program.
(d) The optional nature of participation in the program.
(e) A brief overview of a special needs trust authorized
by the federal Social Security Act and how it may assist with
maintaining eligibility for benefits.
(f) The name and contact information for the person or
office within the department responsible for providing
information regarding eligibility for or assistance with the
program.
(6) The agency shall identify Medicaid recipients who are
enrolled in Supplemental Security Income and a Medicaid home and
community-based services waiver listed in paragraph (3)(b) and
share such information with the department as necessary to
accomplish the purpose of this section.
Section 2. The Department of Children and Families shall
provide the written notices required under s. 409.9041(5),
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb915 -01-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 915 2026 Legislature
Florida Statutes, to currently eligible enrollees under s.
409.9041(3), Florida Statutes, within 90 days after the
effective date of this act.
Section 3. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb915 -01-er